Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB144.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) On July 1, 2025, any provision of a restrictive
covenant that limits or prohibits the installation of solar panels on the
rooftop of any residential property is hereby declared to be void and
unenforceable.
(b) After July 1, 2025, a homeowners association may adopt
reasonable rules concerning solar panels, except that such rules shall not
prohibit the installation of solar panels on the rooftop of a residential
property.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.